Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2717
Exemption from liability.

There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any member insurer or its directors, officers, agents, or employees, the association or its agents or employees, members of its board of directors, or the director or his or her representatives for any action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 13.